Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10A-140] Formulary; accessibility
requirements. (a) Each insurer offering or renewing an individual or
group accident and health or sickness insurance policy on or after January 1,
2017, shall provide the following information via a public website and through
a toll-free number that is posted on the insurer's website:

(1) Its formulary; provided that notice of any
changes due to the addition of a new drug or deletion of any existing drug
shall be made available no later than seventy-two hours after the effective
date of the change; provided further that notice of other changes, including
drug strength or form, shall be made available within fourteen calendar days of
the effective date of the change;

(2) Provide a system that allows an insured or potential
insured to determine whether prescription drugs are covered under the plan's
medical benefits and typically administered by a provider, along with any
cost-sharing imposed on such drugs;

(3) Indicate a dollar amount range of cost-sharing
typically paid by an insured of each specific drug included on the formulary
based on the information the insurer has available, as follows:

(A) $100 and under: $;

(B) Over $100 to $250: $$;

(C) Over $250 to $500: $$$;

(D) Over $500 to $1,000: $$$$; and

(E) Over $1,000: $$$$$; and

(4) Display standardized content for the formulary
for each product offered by the plan pursuant to recommendations made by the
formulary accessibility working group established pursuant to Act 197, Session
Laws of Hawaii 2015.

(b) For the purposes of this section,
"formulary" means the complete list of drugs preferred for use and
eligible for coverage under a policy, including drugs covered under the
policy's pharmacy benefit and medical benefit as defined by the health care
service plans.

(c) This section shall not apply to limited
benefit health insurance as provided in section 431:10A-102.5; provided further
that this section shall not apply to medicare, medicaid, or other federally
financed plans. [L 2015, c 197, §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next